lexd_components/hye-verbs_paradigms_with_lex.lexd
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!  M O R P H O T A C T I C S  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!



#Develop complex tenses with onstraint Grammar TO DO

#TO DO Valency morphology (passive, causative, inchoative)
# Theme-less causatives, maybe tags or columns
# Maybe the nil group shouldnt get a causative version? or cil class
# lexical caus/passives can get their own lexical entry
#via https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Word_sense_disambiguation and Lexical Selection

# TO DO use postdix (post-generator) to figure out how to get ci -> c'
#https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Post-generator
#Could use post-dix to do indicative too

#TO DO: gbcil is an incomplete paradigm in Boyacioglu but it has more entries in EANC
#TO DO check for paradigm leveling of irregular nil/cil in imperatives to get aorist (EANC)


# TO DO double check defectives
#15 Cil prohibtive, negativ present/imperfect,evid,subj
#15 16 difference in Imperative

#Add exlamation mark for imperative TO DO

#Not sure if participles should count as verbal TO DO
#because they feel verbal, but can also act as nouns/adjectives 

# Got unclear data on whether հուսալ ցանկանալ are defective in hye/hyw

########################################
########################################
########################################
##### VERB paradigms
########################################
########################################
########################################
########################################
#Bucket
PATTERNS
Infinitival
DefectiveIndicative
Subjunctive 
ImperfConverbHye # 
ConditionalHye
Past 
Imperative 
ProhibitiveHyeSpecialArchaic # Dir/LR archaic prohibitive   
SubjectPart
ResultPart
PerfectPartHye  # 
ProspectivePart 
SimultaneousPart  # 
FuturePart 
NegativePartHye #  

NegatedChunks 


#Auxiliary 
Aux 
:Neg Aux Neg:

#the special ci- auxiliary in negated periphrastic  3sg
SyntheticNegAux3SGI

#Irregulars that have synthetic indicative negative
:Neg VerbRootHaveHye(1) VZero VerbRootHaveHye(2): ThE Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: Neg: # 
:Neg VerbRootHaveHye(1) VZero VerbRootHaveHye(2): ThE ImpfAgr Indc0: Neg:  # 

:Neg VerbRootKnow(1) VZero VerbRootKnow(2): ThE Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: Neg: # 
:Neg VerbRootKnow(1) VZero VerbRootKnow(2): ThE Pres0 PresAgr3SGThemeEStays Indc0: Neg: #  Dir/LR
:Neg VerbRootKnow(1) VZero VerbRootKnow(2): ThE ImpfAgr Indc0: Neg:  # 
 

:Neg VerbRootWorth(1) VZero VerbRootWorth(2): ThE Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: Neg: # 
:Neg VerbRootWorth(1) VZero VerbRootWorth(2): ThE Pres0 PresAgr3SGThemeEStays Indc0: Neg: #  Dir/LR
:Neg VerbRootWorth(1) VZero VerbRootWorth(2): ThE ImpfAgr Indc0: Neg:  # 

:Neg VerbRootExist(1) VZero VerbRootExist(2): ThA Pres0 PresAgr Indc0:  Neg:
:Neg VerbRootExist(1) VZero VerbRootExist(2): ThA ImpfAgr Indc0: Neg: 

:Neg VerbRootCanShort(1) VZero VerbRootCanShort(2): ThA Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: Neg: # 
:Neg VerbRootCanShort(1) VZero VerbRootCanShort(2): ThA ImpfAgr Indc0: Neg:  # 

#Particles
Deb
Proh



PATTERN VerbStemE
VerbRootE(1) VZero VerbRootE(2):

PATTERN VerbStemA
VerbRootA(1) VZero VerbRootA(2):


#Base of causative is root+th
PATTERN CausBase
VerbStemE ThE 
VerbStemE ThA? # Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-less or with mismatched vowel 
VerbStemA ThA 
VerbStemA ThE? # Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-less or with mismatched vowel  

InchBase InchEmpty  #<inch> marked by either covert or overt -n-
InchBaseWashHye InchEmpty # 

#This is for lexically listed causatives
#Lexical causatives take their own special valency tag. Might need to change this later if 
#it violates some tagging rule TO DO
CausativeVerbRoot VZero # [<caus_listed>:]
#Orthographic variants are separately handled based on the inflection lsot


PassiveVerbRoot VZero Pass ThE  # have to expand the passbase into passroot in order to prevent recursive self-reference back to caus
PassiveVerbRoot VZero Pass ThA? # Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-less or with mismatched vowel 


#Irregulars

#Irregulars infixed i-theme
VerbRootNelHye(1)   VZero VerbRootNelHye(2):    ThE  #  անցնիլ group from Boyacioglu
VerbRootNelHye(1)   VZero VerbRootNelHye(2): (EmptyNasal  ThE)?  #   Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-less or infix-less
VerbRootNelTogHye(1)   VZero VerbRootNelTogHye(2): (EmptyNasal  ThE)?  #   Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-less or infix-less

# VerbRootCilV(1)|VerbRootCilC(1)   VZero VerbRootCilV(2):|VerbRootCilC(2):     # կպչիլ group from Boyacioglu


VerbRootCelHye(1) EmptyAffr VZero VerbRootCelHye(2):  ThE  		#  դպչել 
VerbRootCelHye(1) EmptyAffr? VZero VerbRootCelHye(2): ThE? #   Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-less or infix-less

#Irregular infixed non-i-theme

VerbRootNelNale(1)  VZero VerbRootNelNale(2):  ThE  #իջնել իջնալ
VerbRootNelNale(1)  VZero VerbRootNelNale(2): (EmptyNasal ThE)? # Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-less or infix-less
VerbRootNelNala(1)   VZero VerbRootNelNala(2):   ThA 
VerbRootNelNala(1)  VZero VerbRootNelNala(2): (EmptyNasal ThA)? # Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-less or infix-less


VerbRootCry(1) VZero VerbRootCry(2): ThA   # լալ
VerbRootCry(1) VZero VerbRootCry(2): ThA Aor ThA  # Dir/LR լացացնել
VerbRootCryLong(1) VZero VerbRootCryLong(2): ThE   # լացել
VerbRootBring(1) VZero VerbRootBring(2): ThE   # բերել
VerbRootBring(1) VZero VerbRootBring(2): ThE? # Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-les
VerbRootSeeA(1) VZero VerbRootSeeA(2):     # տեսնել
VerbRootSeeA(1) VZero VerbRootSeeA(2): (EmptyNasal? ThE)? # Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-less or infix-less
VerbRootSeeE(1) VZero VerbRootSeeE(2):    # տեսնալ
VerbRootSeeE(1) VZero VerbRootSeeE(2): (EmptyNasal? ThA)? # Dir/LR   to capture variation in theme-less or infix-less
VerbRootPutPres(1) VZero VerbRootPutPres(2): ThE   # դնել
VerbRootGoPastHye(1) VZero VerbRootGoPastHye(2): ThA   #  գնացնել
VerbRootHitStop(1) VZero VerbRootHitStop(2): ThE   # զարկել
VerbRootEatPast(1) VZero VerbRootEatPast(2):     # ուտել
VerbRootEatPres(1) VZero VerbRootEatPres(2):  ThE   # Dir/LR
VerbRootStandHyePastANoAff(1) VZero VerbRootStandHyePastANoAff(2):    
VerbRootStandHyePastENoAff(1) VZero VerbRootStandHyePastENoAff(2):     # Dir/LR
VerbRootRiseEPast(1) VZero VerbRootRiseEPast(2):    

#Base of passive is root
PATTERN PassBase
VerbStemE 
VerbStemA ThA Aor

CausBase CausPass 
#This is for orthographic variants
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicSchwa VZero  CausPass # [<caus_listed>:]
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffr VZero CausOrthographicAffrPass # [<caus_listed>:] 
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffrSchwa VZero  CausOrthographicAffrPass # [<caus_listed>:]


#This is for lexically listed passives
#Lexical passives take their own special valency tag. Might need to change this later if 
#it violates some tagging rule TO DO
PassiveVerbRoot VZero # [<pass_listed>:] 

#Should I care that this will rarely be traversed? TO DO
InchBase InchEmpty Aor 
InchBaseWashHye InchEmpty Aor # 

#Passives of irregular or suppletive verbs
VerbRootNelHye(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelHye(2):  #  անցնիլ group from Boyacioglu
VerbRootNelHye(1) VZero VerbRootNelHye(2):  #  Dir/LR to capture variation in infix-drop
VerbRootNelTogHye(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelTogHye(2):  #  անցնիլ group from Boyacioglu
VerbRootNelTogHye(1) VZero VerbRootNelTogHye(2):  #  Dir/LR to capture variation in infix-drop


# VerbRootCilV(1)|VerbRootCilC(1) EmptyAffr VZero VerbRootCilV(2):|VerbRootCilC(2): # կպչիլ group from Boyacioglu


VerbRootCelHye(1) EmptyAffr VZero VerbRootCelHye(2): 		#    դպչել 
VerbRootCelHye(1) VZero VerbRootCelHye(2):  #    Dir/LR to capture variation in infix-drop


VerbRootNelNale(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelNale(2):  #իջնել իջնալ
VerbRootNelNale(1)  VZero VerbRootNelNale(2):  # Dir/LR to capture variation in infix-drop
VerbRootNelNala(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelNala(2): 
VerbRootNelNala(1)  VZero VerbRootNelNala(2):  # Dir/LR to capture variation in infix-drop

VerbRootGivePassive(1) VZero VerbRootGivePassive(2):  # տալ
VerbRootBring(1) VZero VerbRootBring(2):   # բերել
VerbRootTurnPast(1) VZero VerbRootTurnPast(2):  # դառնալ
VerbRootBarnalHyePast(1) VZero VerbRootBarnalHyePast(2):  #  բառնալ
VerbRootTake(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootTake(2):  # առնել
VerbRootTake(1)  VZero VerbRootTake(2):  # Dir/LR to capture variation in infix-drop
VerbRootSeeA(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootSeeA(2):  # տեսնել
VerbRootSeeA(1)  VZero VerbRootSeeA(2):  # Dir/LR to capture variation in infix-drop
VerbRootSeeE(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootSeeE(2):  # տեսնալ
VerbRootSeeE(1)  VZero VerbRootSeeE(2):  # Dir/LR to capture variation in infix-drop
VerbRootOpenAffr(1) VZero VerbRootOpenAffr(2):  # բացել
VerbRootOpenNasalPast(1) VZero VerbRootOpenNasalPast(2):  # բացել
VerbRootPutPast(1) VZero VerbRootPutPast(2):   # դնել
VerbRootHitStop(1) VZero VerbRootHitStop(2):   # 
VerbRootDoPast(1) VZero VerbRootDoPast(2):   # ընել
VerbRootSay(1) VZero VerbRootSay(2):  # ըսել
VerbRootEatPres(1) VZero VerbRootEatPres(2):   # ուտվել
VerbRootEatPast(1) VZero VerbRootEatPast(2):   # Dir/LR կերվել
VerbRootSendPast(1) VZero VerbRootSendPast(2):   # տանիլ
VerbRootWetHyePast(1) VZero VerbRootWetHyePast(2):   # թացվել


#Base of inchoative is root+th or root
PATTERN InchBase
InchRoot(1) VZero InchRoot(2): 
# InchRootTh0(1) VZero InchRootTh0(2): 
# InchRootThA(1) ThA VZero InchRootThA(2):
# InchRootThE(1) ThE VZero InchRootThE(2):

PATTERN InchBaseWashHye
InchRootWash(1) VZero InchRoot(2): 

#Infinitival
PATTERN Infinitival
VerbStemE ThE Inf
VerbStemA ThA Inf

CausBase CausPres ThE Inf
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicSchwa VZero CausOrthographicSchwaPres ThE Inf #  [<caus_listed>:] 
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffr VZero CausOrthographicAffrPres ThE Inf # [<caus_listed>:] 
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffrSchwa VZero  CausOrthographicAffrSchwaPres ThE Inf # [<caus_listed>:]


PassBase Pass ThE Inf #   


InchBase InchNasal ThA Inf
InchBaseWashHye InchNasal ThA Inf # 

#Archaic/obsolete
# VerbRootUv(1) VZero VerbRootUv(2): ThU Inf # արտահեղուլ 
# VerbRootUc(1) VZero VerbRootUc(2): ThU Inf # թողուլ 
# VerbRootUcanel(1) VZero VerbRootUcanel(2): ThA EmptyNasal ThE Inf  # Dir/LR # ծանուցանել , preferably part of RootE class
# VerbRootNulV(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNulV(2): ThU Inf # երդնուլ 
# VerbRootNulC(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNulC(2): ThU Inf # զբօսնուլ

#Irregulars
VerbRootNelHye(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelHye(2): ThE Inf #  անցնիլ group from Boyacioglu
VerbRootNelTogHye(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelTogHye(2): ThE Inf #  անցնիլ group from Boyacioglu



VerbRootCelHye(1) EmptyAffr VZero VerbRootCelHye(2): ThE Inf 		#    դպչել  
		 
VerbRootNelNale(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelNale(2): ThE Inf #իջնել իջնալ
VerbRootNelNala(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelNala(2): ThA Inf 
VerbRootRiseEPres(1) VZero VerbRootRiseEPres(2): ThE Inf #ելլել ելլալ ելնել ելնալ
VerbRootRiseAPres(1) VZero VerbRootRiseAPres(2): ThA Inf 
